Hawaii statutes.
[§489D-6] License qualifications. (a) Each licensee, at all times,
shall have a net worth of not less than $1,000, calculated in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles.

(b) Each corporate applicant, at the time of
filing an application, and at all times after a license is issued, shall be in
good standing in the state of its incorporation. All non-corporate applicants,
at the time of filing an application for a license under this chapter, and at
all times after a license is issued, shall be registered or qualified to do
business in the State. [L 2006, c 153, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next